Georgia statutes. 
(a) The General Assembly finds that allowing local government to license, contract with, or both license and contract with private companies to finance, construct, maintain, improve, own, or operate, or any combination thereof, private toll roads and bridges can provide significant public benefits to the citizens of this state in facilitating transportation of the general public without the need for additional public tax revenues. The General Assembly also finds that such facilitation of transportation of the public by private enterprise is an important public purpose and function. The General Assembly further finds that general law impediments to such arrangements should be removed. To implement these findings, this Code section shall control the subject matter thereof notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.

(b) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Local government" means any county or municipality of this state.

(2) "Person" means any natural person, partnership, corporation, trust, association, or any other legal entity, other than the state or a political subdivision thereof.

(3) "Project" means a toll road or toll bridge.

(c) A local government may contract with, license, or both contract with and license a person to finance, construct, maintain, improve, own, or operate, or any combination thereof, a project along the boundaries of or within such local government. In furtherance of the enhanced transportation for its residents and others which such project can provide, such local government may finance, construct, maintain, improve, own, or operate, or any combination thereof, within the boundaries of such local government any necessary highway approaches to such project. Such contract, license, or contract and license may be executed by a local government without complying with the contracting requirements of Chapter 10 of this title. A contract, license, or contract and license authorized by this subsection may extend for any period as determined by the local government notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 36-60-13 or any other provision of law. Such contract, license, or contract and license shall not impose any debt upon such local government unless that debt is incurred in conformity with Article IX, Section V of the Constitution. Such local government shall not lend its credit as part or in furtherance of such contract, license, or contract and license. Neither the local government nor the state shall make any improvements or otherwise expend public funds upon property owned by or leased to a person for a project.

(d) Any property or rights therein of another person which are necessary for the project authorized by such contract, license, or contract and license may be procured by such local government exercising its power of eminent domain on behalf of and for the project and may be leased or sold to the person whom the local government has contracted with, licensed, or contracted with and licensed for such project, unless such property or rights therein are owned by the state or a political subdivision of the state. In all other respects such power of eminent domain shall conform to the requirements imposed by law. Any such property or rights therein owned by the state or a political subdivision thereof may be leased by such owner for any period, as determined by such owner, or sold by such owner and may only be leased or sold for fair market value. In determining such valuation, at least three written appraisals of the value of the property or rights therein shall be obtained by the owning state or political subdivision. Those appraisals shall be made by any person familiar with property values in the area where the property is situated, at least one of which appraisals shall be made by a member of a nationally recognized appraisal organization. If the state is the owner, such lease or sale shall be executed by the State Properties Commission and may be executed without competitive bidding upon written determination by that commission that such lease or sale is necessary for the project and the public interest is served by such use of state property; provided, however, that if the Department of Transportation is the owner, such lease or sale shall be handled by the Department of Transportation in accordance with its normal procedures for the acquisition and disposal of department rights of way.

(e) A contract authorized under this Code section shall provide, in addition to any other requirements:

(1) The right to finance, construct, maintain, improve, own, or operate, or any combination thereof, the project and that such right shall be irrevocable but need not be exclusive;

(2) The right to own the project and to set, fix, change, and collect tolls;

(3) Rights of assignment and amendment;

(4) The duty of the person to provide for design and construction of the project and standards therefor;

(5) Provisions for maintenance and operation, liability, and other operational matters;

(6) Rights and duties of the parties regarding connecting roads, highways, streets, bridges, or transitways; and

(7) Such other matters as shall be deemed appropriate or necessary.

(f) A project operated pursuant to a contract, license, or contract and license authorized under this Code section shall not be subject to regulation as to toll amounts or any other matters by the Public Service Commission, the Department of Transportation, or the State Road and Tollway Authority, except those matters related to the regulation of safety or hazardous materials as provided for in Title 46.

(g) Nothing in this Code section shall limit the exercise of the power of eminent domain by the state or a local government regarding a project.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-21, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 928, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 36; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 2-1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, Code Section 36-60-19 as enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 928, § 1, was redesignated as 36-60-21.

36-60-22. Rock quarry operations prohibited under certain circumstances.

Statute text

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, if the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources determines after a scientific analysis that such a quarry location has significant adverse impact on the water system, no person may commence the operation of a limestone or dolostone rock quarry within eight miles of any well or spring accessing an underground source of water which provides water to any county or municipality in an amount of at least 50 percent of such county's or municipality's water supply or two million gallons per day, whichever is less.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-22, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 748, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, Code Section 36-60-19 as enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1248, § 1, was redesignated as 36-60-23.

36-60-23. Volunteer firefighters for counties and municipalities.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "volunteer firefighter" means a person who is a volunteer firefighter, as defined in Code Section 47-7-1, relating to definitions regarding the Georgia Firefighters' Pension Fund, and who receives no compensation for services as a volunteer firefighter other than:

(1) Actual expenses incurred;

(2) A per diem for services;

(3) Contributions to the Georgia Firefighters' Pension Fund;

(4) Workers' compensation coverage under Chapter 9 of Title 34; or

(5) Any combination of items specified in paragraphs (1) through (4) of this subsection.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 36-30-4, 45-2-2, or any other provision of law to the contrary, a volunteer firefighter for a county or municipal corporation shall be eligible to serve as a member of the governing authority of that county or municipal corporation.

(c) Nothing in this Code section shall require a county or municipal governing authority to make any of the payments or offer the benefits to volunteer firefighters specified in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-23, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1248, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Firefighter appreciation day, § 1-4-12.

Firefighter standards and training, T. 25, C. 4.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, Code Section 31-60-19 as enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1248, § 1, was redesignated as 36-60-23, and "Fund" was substituted for "fund" in paragraph (a)(3).

36-60-24. Sale or use or ignition of consumer fireworks products.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of a county or municipal corporation shall not prohibit the sale or use or ignition of consumer fireworks or other products or services which are lawful under Chapter 10 of Title 25, unless such prohibition is expressly authorized by general law.

(b) If the sale of a product or service is regulated by Chapter 10 of Title 25, the governing authority of a county or municipal corporation shall not enact additional regulation of the sale or use or ignition of such product or service, unless such additional regulation is expressly authorized by general law.

(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, the governing authority of a county or municipal corporation may provide for permits or licenses for the sale or use of consumer fireworks as provided for under subsection (c) of Code Section 25-10-5.1.

(d) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, the governing authority of a county or municipal corporation may further regulate the sale of consumer fireworks from temporary consumer fireworks retail sales stands until January 31, 2018.

(e) The governing authority of a county or municipal corporation shall not unreasonably delay or deny an application for a temporary consumer fireworks retail sales stand.

(f) For purposes of this subsection, the terms "consumer fireworks" and "consumer fireworks retail sales stand" shall have the same meanings as provided in Code Section 25-10-1.

(g) Any ordinance enacted before, on, or after July 1, 2006, by a county or municipal corporation in violation of this Code section is void.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-24, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 544, § 1/HB 304; Ga. L. 2015, p. 274, § 8/HB 110; Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 13/HB 727.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 55 (2016).

36-60-25. Certificates of public necessity and convenience and medallions for taxicabs.

Statute text

(a) Each county and municipal corporation may require the owner or operator of a taxicab to obtain a certificate of public necessity and convenience or medallion in order to operate such taxicab within the unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate limits of the municipal corporation, respectively, and may exercise its authority under Code Section 48-13-9 to require such owners or operators to pay a regulatory fee to the county or municipal corporation. The General Assembly finds and declares that any county or municipality exercising the powers granted in this Code section is legitimately concerned with the qualifications and records of drivers of taxicabs; with the location, accessibility, and insured state of companies operating taxicabs; and with the safety and comfort of taxicabs. Without limitation, each such county or municipality may exercise the powers granted in this Code section by ordinance to the same extent as the ordinances reviewed by the Georgia Court of Appeals in the case of Hadley v. City of Atlanta, 232 Ga. App. 871, 875 (1998), and each certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under those ordinances shall remain in full force and effect.

(b) Each certificate of public necessity and convenience or medallion issued at any time by a county or municipal corporation shall be fully transferable pursuant to a purchase, gift, bequest, or acquisition of the stock or assets of a corporation to any person otherwise meeting the requirements of the applicable local ordinance. Each such certificate of public necessity and convenience or medallion may be used as collateral to secure a loan and each lending institution making such a loan shall have all rights of secured parties with respect to such loan.

(c) Counties and municipalities which have adopted and have valid ordinances as of July 1, 2014, requiring taxicabs to have certificates of public necessity and convenience or medallions to operate within each such county or municipality may continue to require such certificates or medallions. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no county or municipality shall enact, adopt, or enforce any ordinance or regulation which requires taxicabs to have certificates of public necessity and convenience or medallions to operate within such county or municipality.

(d) No person shall operate a taxicab for the purpose of carrying or transporting passengers for hire unless such person has a for-hire license endorsement or private background check certification pursuant to Code Section 40-5-39. Counties and municipalities shall not impose further licensing requirements or background checks on such persons to operate taxicabs in their jurisdictions.

(e) As used in this subsection, the term "stage" means to stop, park, or otherwise place a vehicle for hire, other than a taxicab, in the loading or curbside area of any business for the purpose of soliciting a fare when such vehicle is not engaged in a prearranged round-trip or prearranged one-way fare. It shall be illegal to stage limousine carriers, as defined in paragraph (5) of Code Section 40-1-151, or ride share drivers, as defined in paragraph (3) of Code Section 40-1-190. A person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(f) No person shall operate a taxicab for the purpose of carrying or transporting passengers for hire unless such person maintains insurance from an insurance company licensed under Title 33, through a surplus line broker licensed under Title 33, or is qualified as a self-insurer pursuant to Code Section 33-34-5.1.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-25, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 677, § 1/HB 519; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1262, § 1/HB 225.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008). For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 213 (2015). For annual survey on commercial transportation, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 41 (2017).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Impact of 2015 amendment. - Dismissal of the city taxi cab drivers' complaint for failure to state a cause of action that the 2015 amendment of O.C.G.A. § 36-60-25(a) resulted in an unconstitutional taking and inverse condemnation was affirmed because no law prohibited the city from increasing the Certificates of Public Necessity and Convenience (CPNC) limit and no property interest the drivers may have in their respective CPNCs extended to exclusivity or a limited supply of CPNCs. Abramyan v. State of Ga., 301 Ga. 308, 800 S.E.2d 366 (2017).

No inverse condemnation shown. - Taxicabs have been the subject of frequent and intensive regulation in the State of Georgia, and O.C.G.A. § 36-60-25(a) does not take business property for a public use, the statute merely requires an already regulated business to adjust its property to the new law. Abramyan v. State of Ga., 301 Ga. 308, 800 S.E.2d 366 (2017).

No contractual agreement established with city trhough statutes or ordinances. - In a suit brought by taxi cab companies, the trial court properly granted the city's motion to dismiss because the taxi cab companies failed to establish that the statutes permitting the issuance of Certificates of Public Necessity and Convenience (CPNC), or the city's ordinances, created a clear and unequivocal intent by the city to create a contractual or franchise agreement that prevented the city allowing personal transportation network companies to operate in the city. Atlanta Metro Leasing, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 353 Ga. App. 785, 839 S.E.2d 278 (2020).

36-60-26. Unlawful to issue backdated license, permit, or other authorizing document; documents issued in violation void in entirety; criminal penalty for violations.

Statute text

(a) It shall be unlawful for any county, municipal corporation, or other issuing authority to issue any backdated license, permit, or other authorizing document, including but not limited to any building permit, sign permit, occupation tax certificate, zoning action, subdivision of land, final plat, or other similar authorization, in any territorial or geographic area which, due to the formation of a county, incorporation of a municipality, annexation or deannexation of territory, or other action, is no longer within the regulatory jurisdiction of said issuing authority. For purposes of this Code section, a license, permit, or other authorizing document shall be considered to be backdated if it in any manner purports to have been issued or have become effective prior to its actual date of issuance.

(b) A license, permit, or other authorizing document in violation of this Code section shall be void in its entirety, and no person shall acquire any rights thereunder.

(c) Any county or municipal officer or employee who knowingly violates this Code section shall be upon conviction guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-26, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 154, § 1/HB 975.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2008, p. 154, § 2/HB 975, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The General Assembly declares its belief that this Act is declaratory of previously existing law; and the passage of this Act shall not be construed to imply that prior law was to the contrary."

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Acquisition of vested rights in permits. - Void county sign ordinance could not be used as the basis for the denial of sign companies' applications for permits to construct billboards, and the invalidity of the ordinance resulted in there being no valid restriction on the construction of billboards in the county. Accordingly, the sign companies obtained vested rights in the issuance of the billboard construction permits which the companies sought before the city ordinances were enacted. Fulton County v. Action Outdoor Adver., JV, LLC, 289 Ga. 347, 711 S.E.2d 682 (2011).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Fingerprinting required for violators. - Offenses arising under O.C.G.A. § 36-60-26 are designated as offenses for which those charged are to be fingerprinted. 2009 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2009-1.

——————————

CHAPTER 61

URBAN REDEVELOPMENT

Sec.

36-61-1. Short title.

36-61-2. Definitions.

36-61-3. Legislative findings and declaration of necessity.

36-61-3.1. "Public use" defined; eminent domain to be exercised solely for public use.

36-61-4. Encouragement of private enterprise.

36-61-5. Resolution of necessity prerequisite to exercise of powers.

36-61-6. Formulation of workable program.

36-61-7. Preparation of redevelopment plan; approval; modification; effect of approval.

36-61-8. Powers of municipalities and counties generally.

36-61-9. Power of eminent domain; conditions; title acquired.

36-61-10. Disposal of property in redevelopment area generally; notice and bidding procedures; exchange with veterans' organization; temporary operation of property.

36-61-11. Repair, closing, and demolition of dwellings unfit for human habitation.

36-61-12. Issuance of bonds; payment; tax exemption; form; terms; signatures; negotiability; effect of recitation on bonds.

36-61-13. Bonds declared legal investments.

36-61-14. Exemption of property from execution, levy, and sale; tax exemption.

36-61-15. Presumption as to title of purchaser of property from municipality or county.

36-61-16. Assistance by public bodies generally; powers of public bodies; powers of municipalities and counties.

36-61-17. Exercise of redevelopment powers by municipalities and counties; delegation to redevelopment agency or housing authority.

36-61-18. Creation of agency; appointment of board of commissioners; compensation, term, and certificate; annual report; removal of commissioners.

36-61-19. Interest by public official or employee or employee of redevelopment agency in redevelopment project or property; disclosure; eligibility of commissioners and officers of housing authorities for other office.

Annotations

Cross references. - Community redevelopment generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. VII.

Clearance and rehabilitation of blighted areas generally, T. 8, C. 4.

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Opportunity Zone Job Tax Credit Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Community Affairs, Opportunity Zone Job Tax Credit Program Regulations, Chapter 110-24.

Law reviews. - For note discussing meaning of "public use" and analyzing theories of excess condemnation, see 18 Mercer L. Rev. 274 (1966).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

This chapter provides for rehabilitation, clearance, and redevelopment of slums in cities and towns in the state. McCord v. Housing Auth., 246 Ga. 547, 272 S.E.2d 247 (1980).

36-61-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Urban Redevelopment Law."

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. 1976, p. 946, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that all powers, privileges, duties, or immunities now or heretofore granted to municipalities by the Urban Redevelopment Law (this chapter), and all Acts amendatory thereof, are granted and conferred upon every county of this state.

Law reviews. - For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Housing Authority could sell acquired property to private party. - Georgia's Urban Redevelopment Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-61-1 et seq., authorized a housing authority to exercise eminent domain to acquire and redevelop urban property found to be a "slum area;" the housing authority's disposition of condemned property was authorized, and the housing authority was entitled to summary judgment on a former owner's claim that property had been acquired and then sold to a private party. Talley v. Housing Auth., 279 Ga. App. 94, 630 S.E.2d 550 (2006).

Cited in City of Stockbridge v. Meeks, 283 Ga. App. 343, 641 S.E.2d 584 (2007).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Application of Kelo v. City of New London, 545 U.S. 469, 125 S. Ct. 2655, 162 L. Ed. 2d 439 (2005), to "Public Use" restrictions in federal and state constitutions takings clauses and eminent domain statutes, 21 A.L.R.6th 261.

36-61-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Agency" or "urban redevelopment agency" means a public agency created by Code Section 36-61-18.

(2) "Area of operation" means the area within the corporate limits of the municipality or county and the area within five miles of such limits, except that it shall not include any area which lies within the territorial boundaries of another incorporated municipality or another county unless a resolution is adopted by the governing body of such other municipality or county declaring a need therefor.

(3) "Board" or "commission" means a board, commission, department, division, office, body, or other unit of the municipality or county.

(4) "Bonds" means any bonds (including refunding bonds), notes, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness, debentures, or other obligations.

(5) "Clerk" means the clerk or other official of the municipality or county who is the custodian of the official records of such municipality or county.

(6) "County" means any county in this state.

(7) "Downtown development authority" means an authority created pursuant to Chapter 42 of this title.

(8) "Federal government" means the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

(9) "Housing authority" means a housing authority created by and established pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 8, the "Housing Authorities Law."

(10) "Local governing body" means the council or other legislative body charged with governing the municipality and the board of commissioners or governing authority of the county.

(11) "Mayor" means the mayor of a municipality or other officer or body having the duties customarily imposed upon the executive head of a municipality.

(12) "Municipality" means any incorporated city or town in this state.

(13) "Obligee" includes any bondholder, agents, or trustees for any bondholders, or any lessor demising to the municipality or county property used in connection with an urban redevelopment project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the municipality or county.

(14) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other person acting in a similar representative capacity.

(15) "Pocket of blight" means an area in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whether residential or nonresidential, which by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age, or obsolescence; inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces; high density of population and overcrowding; existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes; or any combination of such factors, are conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, or crime and detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare. Pocket of blight also means an area which by reason of the presence of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures; predominance of defective or inadequate street layout; faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness; unsanitary or unsafe conditions; deterioration of site or other improvements; tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land; the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes; having development impaired by airport or transportation noise or other environmental hazards; or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a municipality or county, retards the provisions of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and use.

(16) "Pocket of blight clearance and redevelopment" may include:

(A) Acquisition of a pocket of blight or portion thereof;

(B) Rehabilitation or demolition and removal of buildings and improvements;

(C) Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out in the area the urban redevelopment provisions of this chapter in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan; and

(D) Making the land available for development or redevelopment by private enterprise or public agencies, including sale, initial leasing, or retention by the municipality or county itself, at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan.

(17) "Public body" means the state or any municipality, county, board, commission, authority, district, housing authority, urban redevelopment agency, or other subdivision or public body of the state.

(18) "Real property" includes all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon and property of any nature appurtenant thereto or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest, right, and use, legal or equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise.

(19) "Rehabilitation" or "conservation" may include the restoration and redevelopment of a pocket of blight or portion thereof, in accordance with an urban redevelopment plan, by:

(A) Carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements;

(B) Acquisition of real property and rehabilitation or demolition and removal of buildings and improvements thereon where necessary to eliminate unhealthful, unsanitary, or unsafe conditions, to lessen or increase density, to reduce traffic hazards, to eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, to otherwise remove or prevent the spread of pockets of blight or deterioration, or to provide land for needed public facilities or improvements, including, but not limited to, surface transportation projects;

(C) Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, transit facilities and improvements, sidewalks, streetscapes, trails, bicycle facilities, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out in the area the urban redevelopment provisions of this chapter; and

(D) The disposition of any property acquired in such urban redevelopment area, including sale, initial leasing or retention by the municipality or county itself, at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan.

(20) "Slum clearance and redevelopment" may include:

(A) Acquisition of a slum area or portion thereof;

(B) Rehabilitation or demolition and removal of buildings and improvements;

(C) Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, transit facilities, sidewalks, streetscapes, trails, bicycle facilities, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other public facilities and improvements necessary for carrying out in the area the urban redevelopment provisions of this chapter in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan; and

(D) Making the land available for development or redevelopment by private enterprise or public agencies (including sale, initial leasing, or retention by the municipality or county itself) at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban redevelopment plan.

(21) "Sponsoring local government" means the municipality or county which approves and is, directly or indirectly, providing the greatest percentage of the public funding, exclusive of federal funding, for a surface transportation project.

(22) "Surface transportation project" means a project for public improvement and any related public facilities which is planned to impact 10,000 or more acres and at least ten transit miles within the area of operation of the sponsoring local government, including any related facilities, systems, parks, trails, streets, greenspace, and any other integrated public or private development features included within any adopted infrastructure or transportation plan, urban redevelopment plan, strategic implementation plan, redevelopment plan, workable programs, or comprehensive plans; provided that the location of such surface transportation project is wholly within a county or counties that have approved a referendum pursuant to Section 24 of an Act creating the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority, approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended; and provided, further, that the project is within one-half mile of a transportation/communications/utilities corridor, which has been designated by the local governing body on or before January 1, 2015, or within the boundaries of a tax allocation district authorized under the provisions of Chapter 44 of this title in effect as of January 1, 2015.

(23) "Urban redevelopment area" means a pocket of blight which the local governing body designates as appropriate for an urban redevelopment project.

(24) "Urban redevelopment plan" means a plan, as it exists from time to time, for an urban redevelopment project, which plan shall:

(A) Conform to the general plan for the municipality or county as a whole; and

(B) Be sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the urban redevelopment area; zoning and planning changes, if any; land uses; maximum densities; building requirements; and the plan's relationship to definite local objectives respecting appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements.

(25) "Urban redevelopment project" may include undertakings or activities of a municipality or county in an urban redevelopment area for the elimination and for the prevention of the development or spread of pockets of blight and may involve pocket of blight clearance and redevelopment in an urban redevelopment area, rehabilitation or conservation in an urban redevelopment area, the implementation of public improvements, including, but not limited to, surface transportation projects, or any combination or part thereof, in accordance with an urban redevelopment plan. Although the power of eminent domain may not be exercised for the following purposes, such undertakings or activities may include:

(A) Acquisition, without regard to any requirement that the area be a pocket of blight, of air rights in an area consisting of lands and highways, railway or subway tracks, bridge or tunnel entrances, or other similar facilities which have a blighting influence on the surrounding area and over which air rights sites are to be developed for the elimination of such blighting influences and for the provision of housing and related facilities and uses designed for, and limited primarily to, families and individuals of low or moderate income; and

(B) Construction of foundations and platforms necessary for the provision of air rights sites of housing and related facilities and uses designed for, and limited primarily to, families and individuals of low or moderate income or construction of foundations necessary for the provision of air rights sites for development of nonresidential facilities.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 19; Ga. L. 1963, p. 644, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 445, §§ 3-5; Ga. L. 1976, p. 946, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2533, §§ 11, 12; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 1/HB 174; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1329, § 2/SB 4; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 36/HB 737.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "Authorities" was substituted for "Authority" in paragraph (9).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-3, in 2015, the amendment of paragraph (19) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 1/HB 174, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1329, § 2/SB 4, due to irreconcilable conflict.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, former paragraphs (19) through (24) were redesignated as present paragraphs (20) through (25), respectively, to maintain alphabetical order.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Allen v. City Council, 215 Ga. 778, 113 S.E.2d 621 (1960); Waller v. Clayton County, 200 Ga. App. 706, 409 S.E.2d 561 (1991).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 40A Am. Jur. 2d, Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment, §§ 1 et seq., 16, 19.

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 58, 59. 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1 et seq., 268, 562 et seq. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1645.

ALR. - What constitutes "Blighted Area" within urban renewal and redevelopment statutes, 45 A.L.R.3d 1096.

36-61-3. Legislative findings and declaration of necessity.

Statute text

(a) It is found and declared that there exist in municipalities and counties of this state pockets of blight, as defined in paragraph (15) of Code Section 36-61-2, which constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public health, safety, morals, and welfare of the residents of this state; that the existence of such areas contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime, constitutes an economic and social liability, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of municipalities and counties, retards the provision of housing accommodations, aggravates traffic problems, and substantially impairs or arrests the elimination of traffic hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities; and that the prevention and elimination of pockets of blight is a matter of state policy and state concern, in order that this state and its municipalities and counties shall not continue to be endangered by areas which are local centers of disease, promote juvenile delinquency, and, while contributing little to the tax income of this state and its municipalities and counties, consume an excessive proportion of its revenues because of the extra services required for police, fire, accident, hospitalization, and other forms of public protection, services, and facilities.

(b) It is further found and declared that certain pockets of blight or portions thereof may require acquisition, clearance, and disposition, subject to use restrictions, as provided in this chapter, since the prevailing condition of decay may make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or rehabilitation; that the other areas or portions thereof, through the means provided in this chapter, may be susceptible of conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils enumerated in subsection (a) of this Code section may be eliminated, remedied, or prevented and that, to the extent that is feasible, salvable pockets of blight should be conserved and rehabilitated through voluntary action and the regulatory process.

(c) It is further found and declared that the powers conferred by this chapter are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be expended and the power of eminent domain may be exercised. The necessity, in the public interest, for the provisions enacted in this chapter is declared as a matter of legislative determination.

History

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 354, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1318, § 2/HB 174.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - The Urban Redevelopment Law is expressly authorized by the Constitution, and it and the acts proposed to be taken thereunder, and in conformity therewith, are not unconstitutional. Bailey v. Housing Auth., 214 Ga. 790, 107 S.E.2d 812 (1959).

Cited in Thompson v. Crownover, 259 Ga. 126, 381 S.E.2d 283 (1989).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 61 et seq.

ALR. - Constitutionality, construction, and application of statutes or governmental projects for improvement of housing conditions (slum clearance), 130 A.L.R. 1069; 172 A.L.R. 966.

36-61-3.1. "Public use" defined; eminent domain to be exercised solely for public use.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "public use" shall have the meaning specified in Code Section 22-1-1.

(b) Any exercise of the power of eminent domain under this chapter must:

(1) Be for a public use; and

(2) Be approved by resolution of the governing body of the municipality or county in conformity with the procedures specified in Code Section 22-1-10.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-61-3.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 22/HB 1313.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as 'The Landowner's Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.'"
